Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska9-305.01
Definite profit, defined.

Definite profit shall mean the gross proceeds from a pickle card unit less all of the possible prizes in the unit.

Laws 1988, LB 1232, § 8;

Laws 1989, LB 767, § 28.